Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 3

Commissioner of Youth Development [Repealed]

37-3-301 — 37-3-303. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-3-301 (Acts 1963, ch. 208, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1101), concerning assistant commissioner for youth services, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 14, effective July 1, 1989. Former §§37-3-302 and37-3-303 (Acts 1963, ch. 208, §§ 2, 3; 1975, ch. 326, §§ 6, 7; 1977, ch. 59, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 37-1102, 37-1103; Acts 1989, ch. 278, §§ 14, 15), concerning medical service consent and placement of children for rehabilitation, were repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 119, effective May 21, 1996.